Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-649.02
Cancer registry; hospital; failure to report; penalty.

Any hospital which fails to make reports as provided in sections 81-642 to 81-649.02 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor for each offense.

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 76;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 33.